District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.52a

Public Safety Executive Service pay schedule.

(a)

The Executive Service Public Safety Schedule (“DX Public Safety Schedule”) shall be divided into 4 pay levels and shall be the basic pay schedule for subordinate agency heads within the public safety cluster who are required to hold a medical degree or another advanced health-related degree.

(b)

The Mayor shall designate the appropriate pay level for each subordinate agency head within the public safety cluster based on market analyses considering the qualifications and work experience of each individual appointee, and other relevant criteria.

(c)

A person paid from the DX Public Safety Schedule shall not be entitled to premium pay.

(d)

Each level within the schedule shall have a minimum and maximum salary range established by the Mayor, subject to Council review and approval by resolution. Initial salary ranges shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council for a 60-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove of the proposed changes to the salary ranges by resolution within this 60-day period, the proposed salary ranges shall be deemed approved.

(e)

Any changes to the salary ranges established pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council for a 15-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove of the proposed changes to the salary ranges by resolution within this 15-day period, the proposed salary ranges shall be deemed approved.

(f)

Initial salary ranges and any changes to the salary ranges shall become effective upon approval and shall be published in the District of Columbia Register no later than 45 days after their approval.

(g)

For the purposes of this section, the term “public safety cluster” means the following District agencies or any successor agencies:

(1)

Department of Forensic Sciences;

(2)

Office of the Chief Medical Examiner;

(3)

Department of Fire and Emergency Medical Services;

(4)

Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services;

(5)

Metropolitan Police Department;

(6)

Department of Corrections;

(7)

Office of Unified Communications; and

(8)

Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1052a
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-267, § 2(c), 62 DCR 1543

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-267 provided that, pursuant to this section, the Council approved proposed initial salary ranges established by the Mayor as the DX Public Safety Schedule for fiscal years 2015 through 2017, and provided the ranges in a table.